Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 1 General Provisions

53-12-1.
Short title; effect on existing trusts.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Revised Georgia Trust Code of 2010.”

Except to the extent it would impair vested rights and except as otherwise provided by law, the provisions contained in this chapter shall apply to any trust regardless of the date such trust was created.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2010, “This chapter” was substituted for “This Act” at the beginning of subsection (a).

Law reviews.

For article, “ ‘Rarely Utilized’: The Georgia Business Trust Code,” see 14 Ga. St. B.J. 12 (2008).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 65 Mercer L. Rev. 295 (2013).

For article, “Self-Settled Asset Protection Trusts in Georgia,” see 23 Ga. St. B.J. 17 (Feb. 2018).

53-12-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Ascertainable standard” means a standard relating to an individual’s health, education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of Section 2041(b)(1)(A) or 2514(c)(1) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

“Beneficiary” means a person for whose benefit property is held in trust, regardless of the nature of the interest, and includes any beneficiary, whether vested or contingent, born or unborn, ascertained or unascertained.

“Express trust” means a trust as described in Code Section 53-12-20.

“Foreign entity” means:

Any financial institution whose deposits are federally insured which is organized or existing under the laws of any state of the United States, other than Georgia, or any subsidiary of such financial institution;

Any other corporation organized or existing under the laws of any state of the United States, other than Georgia, and chartered or licensed under the laws of such state; and

Any federally chartered financial institution whose deposits are federally insured having its principal place of business in any state of the United States, other than Georgia, or any subsidiary of such financial institution.

“Implied trust” means a resulting trust as described in Code Section 53-12-130 or a constructive trust as described in Code Section 53-12-132.

“Nonresident” means an individual who does not reside in Georgia.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, association, joint-stock company, business trust, unincorporated organization, limited liability company, or other legal entity, including any of the foregoing acting as a fiduciary.

“Private foundation” means a private foundation as defined in Section 509 of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

“Property” means any type of property, whether real or personal, tangible or intangible, legal or equitable, and shall include digital assets and electronic communications, as such terms are defined in Code Section 53-13-2.

“Qualified beneficiary” means a living individual or other existing person who, on the date of determination of beneficiary status:

Is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal;

Would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the interests of the distributees described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph terminated on that date without causing the trust to terminate; or

Would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the trust terminated on that date.

The Attorney General has the rights of a qualified beneficiary with respect to a charitable trust as defined in Code Section 53-12-170, and a person appointed to enforce a trust created for the care of an animal under Code Section 53-12-28 also has the rights of a qualified beneficiary.

“Settlor” means the person who creates the trust, including a testator in the case of a testamentary trust.

“Spendthrift provision” means a provision in a trust instrument that prohibits transfers of a beneficiary’s interest in the income or principal or both.

“Trust” means an express trust or an implied trust but shall not include trusts created by statute or the Constitution of Georgia.

“Trust instrument” means the document, including any testamentary instrument, that contains the trust provisions.

“Trust property” means property the legal title to which is held by the trustee. The term also includes choses in action, claims, and contract rights, including a contractual right to receive death benefits as the designated beneficiary under a policy of insurance, contract, employees’ trust, or other arrangement.

“Trustee” means the person or persons holding legal title to the property in trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 551, § 6/SB 134; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 28/HB 143; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1089, § 7/SB 301.

Law reviews.

For comment on First Nat’l Bank & Trust Co. v. Roberts,

187 Ga. 472

,

1 S.E.2d 12

(1939), see 1 Ga. B.J. 50 (1939).

For note discussing problems with profits generated by escrow account, and proposing federal legislative reform, see 10 Ga. St. B.J. 618 (1974).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 204 (2018).

53-12-3.
Survival of common law and equity.

Except to the extent that the principles of common law and equity governing trusts are modified by this chapter or another provision of law, those principles remain the law of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-4.
Law governing the validity of the trust.

As to real property, the validity of a trust shall be determined by the law of the situs of the real property.

As to all other property, the validity of a trust shall be determined by:

The law of the jurisdiction designated in the trust instrument unless the effect of the designation is contrary to the public policy of the jurisdiction having the most significant relationship to the matter at issue; or

In the absence of an effective designation in the trust instrument, the law of the jurisdiction having the most significant relationship to the matter at issue.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-5.
Law governing the meaning and effect of trust provisions.

The meaning and effect of the trust provisions shall be determined by:

The law of the jurisdiction designated in the trust instrument unless the effect of the designation is contrary to the public policy of the jurisdiction having the most significant relationship to the matter at issue; or

In the absence of an effective designation in the trust instrument, the law of the jurisdiction having the most significant relationship to the matter at issue.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 231 (2014).

53-12-6.
Jurisdiction.

Trusts are peculiarly subjects of equity jurisdiction. Suits by or against a trustee that sound at law may be filed in a court of law.

Actions concerning the construction or administration of a trust or for a court to take any actions authorized by the provisions of this chapter shall be maintained in superior court, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 15-9-127.

Any action by or against the trustee or to which the trustee is a party may be maintained in any court having jurisdiction over the parties and the subject matter, except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section or in Code Section 15-9-127.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-70/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “that sound” for “which sound” in subsection (a); in subsection (b), substituted “construction or administration of a trust or for a court to take any actions authorized by the provisions of this chapter” for “construction, administration, or internal affairs of a trust” and inserted a comma after “superior court”; and, in subsection (c), inserted a comma after “subject matter”, inserted “otherwise”, and added “or in Code Section 15-9-127” at the end.

Law reviews.

For note, “Trusts: Creditors’ Claims Against Beneficiaries of Spendthrift and Support Trusts,” see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 356 (1967).

53-12-7.
When trust and chapter conflict.

The effect of the provisions of this chapter may be varied by the trust instrument except:

As to any requirements relating to the creation and validity of express trusts as provided in Article 2 of this chapter;

As to the effect of the rules relating to spendthrift trusts as provided in Article 5 of this chapter;

As to the power of the beneficiaries to modify a trustee’s compensation as provided in Code Section 53-12-210;

As to the duty of a trustee to administer the trust and to exercise discretionary powers in good faith as provided in Code Sections 53-12-240 and 53-12-260;

As to the effect of a provision relieving a trustee from liability as provided in Code Section 53-12-303;

As to the periods of limitation on actions as provided in Code Sections 53-12-45 and 53-12-307; and

As to the effect of the rules relating to trust directors as provided in Article 18 of this chapter.

Nothing in a trust instrument shall prohibit or limit a court from taking any actions authorized by the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 551, § 7/SB 134; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-71/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(5), added “; and” at the end of paragraph (a)(6), and added paragraph (a)(7).

53-12-8.
Notice to person permitted to bind another person; consent on behalf of another person; representation of others.

Notice to a person who may represent and bind another person under this Code section shall have the same effect as if notice were given directly to such other person.

The consent of a person who may represent and bind another person under this Code section shall be binding on the person represented unless the person represented objects to such representation before such consent would otherwise have become effective. Consent shall include, but shall not be limited to, an action related to the granting of powers to a trustee, modification or termination of a trust, a trustee’s duty to report, entry into a binding nonjudicial settlement agreement, a trustee’s compensation, the conversion of a trust to a unitrust, the appointment, resignation, or removal of a trustee, and other similar actions.

Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 53-12-61, a person who under this Code section may represent a settlor who lacks capacity may receive notice and give a binding consent on such settlor’s behalf.

A settlor may not represent and bind a beneficiary under this Code section with respect to the termination or modification of a trust under Article 4 of this chapter.

To the extent there is no conflict of interest between the holder of a power of appointment and the persons represented with respect to the particular question or dispute, such holder may represent and bind persons whose interests are as permissible appointees, as takers in default, or are otherwise subject to the power.

To the extent there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented or among those being represented with respect to a particular question or dispute:

A conservator may represent and bind the estate that the conservator controls;

A guardian may represent and bind his or her ward if a conservator of such ward’s estate has not been appointed;

An agent having authority to act with respect to the particular question or dispute may represent and bind the principal;

A trustee may represent and bind the beneficiaries of the trust;

A trust director may represent and bind the beneficiaries of the trust on a question or dispute relating to the trust director’s powers of direction;

A person designated in the trust instrument to receive notice and provide consent on behalf of a beneficiary may represent and bind a beneficiary;

A personal representative of a decedent’s estate may represent and bind persons interested in such estate; and

An ancestor may represent and bind an ancestor’s minor or unborn descendant if a conservator or guardian for such descendant has not been appointed.

Unless otherwise represented, a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable, may be represented by and bound by another having a substantially identical interest with respect to a particular question or dispute, but only to the extent there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented with respect to such particular question or dispute.

A person who on the date of determination would be eligible to receive distributions of income or principal from the trust upon the termination of the interests of all persons then currently eligible to receive distributions of income or principal may represent and bind contingent successor beneficiaries with respect to matters in which there is no conflict of interest between the representative and the persons represented with respect to a particular question or dispute.

A charitable entity may represent and bind another person and be represented by a person under this Code section in the same manner as an individual.

The representative of a person represented under this Code section may represent and bind any other person who could be represented under this Code section by the person being represented by the representative if the person being represented were living and sui juris, but only to the extent there is no conflict of interest between the representative and such other person or among those being represented with respect to a particular question or dispute.

Any person whose interests would be affected may request that the court determine whether an interest is represented under this Code section or whether the representation is adequate. If the court determines that an interest is not represented under this Code section, or that the otherwise available representation might be inadequate, the court may appoint a representative to receive notice, give consent, and otherwise represent, bind, and act on behalf of a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable. A representative may be appointed to represent several persons or interests. A representative may act on behalf of the individual represented with respect to any matter arising under this chapter, regardless of whether a judicial proceeding concerning the trust is pending. In making decisions, a representative may consider the general benefit accruing to the living members of the individual’s family.

The interests of unascertainable charitable beneficiaries of a trust that is not a charitable trust shall be represented as provided in Code Section 53-12-174 for the beneficiaries under a charitable trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2011, p. 551, § 8/SB 134; Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 4/HB 121; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-72/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “entry into a binding nonjudicial settlement agreement,” in subsection (b); in subsection (f), inserted paragraphs (f)(5) and (f)(6), redesignated former paragraphs (f)(5) and (f)(6) as present paragraphs (f)(7) and (f)(8); in subsection (h), inserted “on the date of determination” and substituted “beneficiaries” for “remainder beneficiaries, including, but not limited to, charitable entities,”; added subsections (i) and (j); redesignated former subsection (i) as present subsection (k); and added subsection (l).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 275 (2018).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-12-9.
Binding nonjudicial settlement agreement.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, the trustee, any trust director, and all other persons whose interests would be affected may enter into a binding nonjudicial settlement agreement with respect to any matter involving the trust.

A nonjudicial settlement agreement:

Shall be valid only to the extent it does not violate a material purpose of the trust and includes terms and conditions that could be properly approved by the court under this Code section or other applicable law; and

Shall not be valid with respect to any modification or termination of an irrevocable trust when the settlor’s consent would be required in a proceeding to approve such modification or termination under subsection (b) of Code Section 53-12-61.

The trustee, trust director, and any person whose interests would be affected by a nonjudicial settlement agreement may request that the court approve such agreement, determine whether the representation as provided in Code Section 53-12-8 was adequate, determine whether such agreement violates a material purpose of the trust, determine whether such agreement contains terms and conditions the court could have properly approved, or make any other similar determination.

A nonjudicial settlement agreement entered into in accordance with this Code section shall be final and binding on all parties to such agreement, including individuals not sui juris, unborn beneficiaries, and persons unknown who are represented by a person who may represent and bind such parties under Code Section 53-12-8, as if ordered by a court with competent jurisdiction over the trust, the trust property, and the parties.

Entering into or petitioning a court regarding a nonjudicial settlement agreement under this Code section shall not constitute a violation of a condition in terrorem under Code Section 53-12-22.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 5/HB 121; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-73/HB 865; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 53/SB 429.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, effective January 1, 2021, deleted former subsection (a), which read: “As used in this Code section, the term ‘interested persons’ means the trustee and all other persons whose consent would be required in order to achieve a binding settlement were the settlement to be approved by the court.”; redesignated former subsections (b) through (e) as present subsections (a) through (d); in present subsection (a), substituted “subsection (b)” for “subsection (c)”, substituted “trustee, any trust director, and all other persons whose interests would be affected” for “interested persons”, and substituted “the trust” for “a trust” at the end; in present subsection (b), inserted “section” following “Code” in paragraph (b)(1) and, in paragraph (b)(2), substituted “an irrevocable trust” for “a noncharitable irrevocable trust” and substituted “a proceeding to approve such modification or termination under subsection (b) of Code Section 53-12-61” for “order to achieve a binding settlement, if such settlement were to be approved by a court”; in subsection (c), substituted “The trustee, trust director, and any person whose interests would be affected by” for “Any interested person may request the court approve”, inserted “may request that the court approve such agreement”, substituted “determine whether such agreement violates a material purpose of the trust,” for “or”, and added “, or make any other similar determination” at the end; in subsection (d), substituted “A nonjudicial settlement” for “An” at the beginning, substituted “all parties to such agreement, including individuals not sui juris, unborn beneficiaries, and persons unknown who are represented by a person who may represent and bind such parties under Code Section 53-12-8,” for “the interested persons”, and substituted “parties” for “interested persons”; and added subsection (e). The second 2020 amendment, effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “this Code section” for “this Code” in paragraph (c)(1) (now (b)(1)).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 enactment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 275 (2018).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).